South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5639.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 17, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-17-165. (A) On July 1, 2028, the area of each county of this State also must be constituted as a school district and a county may not have multiple school districts within its boundaries, provided that nothing in this section prevents a portion of a county from being a part of a school district in another county. (B) The General Assembly by local law before July 1, 2028, shall provide for the governance, fiscal authority, and administrative and operational responsibilities for a countywide school district where no provisions of law now apply. SECTION 2.  All acts or parts of acts relating to a school district that is not a countywide school district required by Section 59-17-165 of the S.C. Code are repealed on July 1, 2028. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----